Illinois, session 104th, HB3738.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 235 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/235 new)7    Sec. 235. Renter's credit. 8    (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 92026, each qualified taxpayer is entitled to a tax credit as 10provided in this Section. If the taxpayer is married filing a 11joint return, then the amount of the credit is $1,000 for both 12taxpayers as a single unit. For all other individual 13taxpayers, the amount of the credit is $500. 14    (b) The credit or credits may not reduce the taxpayer's 15liability to less than zero. Excess credit amounts may not be 16refunded to the taxpayer. 17    (c) As used in this Section, "qualified taxpayer" means an 18individual taxpayer who: 19        (1) paid rent on the taxpayer's personal residence in 20    Illinois for at least 6 months during the taxable year; 21        (2) is not claimed as a dependent on someone else's 22    federal income taxes for the taxable year; and 23        (3) has a federal adjusted gross income of less than   HB3738- 2 -LRB104 10869 HLH 20951 b1    $83,250, if the taxpayer is married filing a joint return, 2    or $40,770, if the taxpayer is not married filing a joint 3    return. 4    (d) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 5250.  6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.